Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.3051

Elected officials—Voluntary salary reduction.

(1) From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, any state elected official of the executive branch may voluntarily reduce his or her salary from that established pursuant to Article XXVIII, section 1 of the state Constitution by three percent.

(2) The department of personnel and office of financial management shall develop a form to be used by any state elected official of the executive branch to execute the salary reduction under subsection (1) of this section through the state's central personnel payroll system.

(3) A voluntary reduction in salary shall be effective and continue through June 29, 2013, unless the state elected official of the executive branch directs in writing that the department of personnel discontinue the reduction.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 39: See note following RCW 41.04.820.